Florida, session 2026, SB994.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 60 61 Section 1.âSection 500.92, Florida Statutes, is amended to 62 read: 63 500.92âFlorida Kratom Consumer Protection Act.â 64 (1)âSHORT TITLE.âThis section may be cited as the âFlorida 65 Kratom Consumer Protection Act.â 66 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 67 (a)ââAttractive to childrenâ means a product manufactured: 68 1.âIn a shape that resembles a human, a cartoon character, 69 or an animal; or 70 2.âIn a form that resembles an existing candy product that 71 is widely distributed or branded. 72 (b)ââFinished kratom productâ means a kratom product that 73 is ready for sale to the end user. For purposes of registration, 74 a finished kratom product is differentiated by its ingredients, 75 not by its weight, volume, or size. 76 (c)Â âKratomâ means the plant or any part of the plant 77 Mitragyna speciosa in any form. 78 (d)ââKratom beverageâ means a prepackaged liquid kratom 79 product in the form of a tea, a seltzer or tonic water, or a 80 tincture. 81 (e)ââKratom food service establishmentâ means any public 82 food service establishment licensed as provided in chapter 509 83 which sells finished kratom products. 84 (f)ââKratom productâ means a food product, food ingredient, 85 dietary ingredient, dietary supplement, or beverage intended for 86 human consumption which contains any part of the leaf of the 87 plant Mitragyna speciosa or an extract, synthetic alkaloid, or 88 synthetically derived compound of such plant and is manufactured 89 as a powder, capsule, pill, beverage, or other consumable edible 90 form. 91 (g)Â âProcessorâ means an entity that: 92 1.âRefines kratom into input ingredients for the purpose of 93 manufacturing a finished kratom product; 94 2.âManufactures finished kratom products; or 95 3.âPackages finished kratom products for resale. 96 (3)âKRATOM PRODUCT RETAIL SALE REQUIREMENTS.âFinished 97 kratom products sold to consumers at retail establishments, 98 including a food establishment as defined in s. 500.03(1), a 99 convenience store, or a kava or kratom bar: 100 (a)âMust be in one of the following delivery forms: 101 1.âDried leaf; 102 2.âKratom beverage; 103 3.âPowder; 104 4.âPill; 105 5.âLiquid dietary supplement; 106 6.âGummy or food; or 107 7.âCapsule. 108 (b)âMust possess a certificate of analysis, which must be 109 submitted to the department pursuant to paragraph (4)(e). 110 (c)âMust be registered with the department pursuant to this 111 section. 112 (d)Â Must include directions for consumption of the kratom 113 product on the productâs label, including, but not limited to: 114 1.âMaximum dosage of 100 milligrams of kratom alkaloids per 115 serving; 116 2.âNumber of servings per package; 117 3.âMilligrams of mitragynine and 7-hydroxymitragynine per 118 serving; 119 4.âA warning advising consumers of the number of servings 120 that may be safely consumed in a 24-hour period; 121 5.âA warning prohibiting use by individuals who are under 122 21 years of age; 123 6.âA warning advising against use by individuals who are 124 pregnant or breastfeeding; 125 7.âA warning advising the consumer to consult a health care 126 professional before use, that the product may be habit-forming, 127 and that it may cause adverse health effects; 128 8.âA warning stating the following: âThese statements have 129 not been evaluated by the United States Food and Drug 130 Administration. This product is not intended to diagnose, treat, 131 cure, or prevent any disease.â; 132 9.âThe expiration date; and 133 10.âThe name and place of business of the registrant. 134 (e)âMust comply with the packaging and labeling 135 requirements set forth in this chapter and with the rules 136 adopted pursuant thereto. 137 (f)âMay not be attractive to children. 138 (g)âMust be packaged in a container that: 139 1.âIs suitable to contain products for human consumption. 140 2.âIs compliant with the United States Poison Prevention 141 Packaging Act of 1970, 15 U.S.C. ss. 1471 et seq. 142 3.âContains a graduated measuring device, if applicable. 143 (h)âMay not be adulterated, including containing metals, 144 pesticides, or pathogens in excess of the limits set by this 145 section or department rule. 146 (i)âMay be sold only in establishments that restrict entry 147 to persons who are 21 years of age or older and require age 148 verification. 149 (j)âMay not be served in a form that combines or mixes 150 finished kratom products with psychoactive substances that 151 impact the central nervous system, including, but not limited 152 to, alcohol, caffeine, kava, cannabinoids, and nicotine. 153 (4)âPERMIT FOR PROCESSING FINISHED KRATOM PRODUCTS AND 154 FEDERAL AND STATE REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS FOR PROCESSORS.â 155 (a)âKratom products may be manufactured or distributed in 156 this state only by a processor who holds a permit issued by the 157 department to operate as a food establishment as defined in s. 158 500.03(1). A processor may not operate as a cottage food 159 operation pursuant to s. 500.80 and is not exempt from food 160 permit requirements pursuant to s. 500.12(1)(a)1. 161 (b)âA processor that manufactures, processes, packs, or 162 offers for sale kratom, kratom products, or finished kratom 163 products must be properly registered with the United States Food 164 and Drug Administration. 165 (c)âA processor shall comply with 21 C.F.R. part 210. 166 (d)âA processor shall maintain product liability insurance 167 with an occurrence limit of $3 million. 168 (e)âFor each batch of a registered, finished kratom 169 product, the processor shall retain and, upon request, submit a 170 certificate of analysis to the department from an accredited 171 laboratory. The laboratory must be accredited under the 172 International Organization for Standardization 173 (ISO)/International Electrotechnical Commission (IEC) 17025:2017 174 general requirements for competence of testing and calibration 175 laboratories standard by an accreditation body that is a 176 signatory to the International Laboratory Accreditation 177 Cooperation Mutual Recognition Arrangement or a subsequent 178 arrangement. The processor may not have any direct or indirect 179 financial or economic interest in the laboratory or accrediting 180 body. The processor shall maintain the certificates of analysis 181 for a minimum of 1 year after the finished kratom productâs 182 expiration date. The certificate of analysis must demonstrate 183 that the finished kratom product is in compliance with the 184 statutory and rule concentration limits for: 185 1.âAlkaloid and alkaloid metabolites; 186 2.âResidual solvents; 187 3.âHeavy metals, including cadmium, arsenic, mercury, and 188 lead; and 189 4.âPesticides and any substance limited by department rule. 190 (f)âA finished kratom product served by a kratom food 191 service establishment must comply with the requirements of this 192 section; however, a separate registration under this subsection 193 is not required when a kratom beverage is combined with another 194 food or beverage by the kratom food service establishment for 195 consumption on premises. 196 (g)âSubsection (3) does not apply to finished kratom 197 products processed or manufactured in this state and 198 subsequently shipped or transported out of this state for sale 199 or use outside of this state. 200 (h)âFinished kratom products produced in this state and 201 subsequently shipped or transported out of this state for sale 202 outside of this state: 203 1.âMay not be sold, shipped, or transported to a consumer 204 in this state, a retail establishment in this state, or to a 205 person who intends to sell such products to a consumer in this 206 state; 207 2.âMust be in a package marked âNOT FOR USE OR RETAIL SALE 208 IN FLORIDAâ in a bold font size of at least 36 points; and 209 3.âMust be physically separated from finished kratom 210 products that are, or are intended to be, sold or used in this 211 state. 212 (5)âREPORTING AND TESTING.â 213 (a)âIf a processor or the department receives notice of any 214 adverse health event suspected to be related to the processorâs 215 kratom product, the processor or the department must submit an 216 adverse event report as set out in chapter 9 of the Federal 217 Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. s. 379aa-1(b)(1) to the 218 United States Food and Drug Administration. 219 (b)âIf probable cause exists that a kratom product may be 220 adulterated, the department may require an independent third 221 party test of the kratom product by a laboratory of the 222 departmentâs choice, and the processor must pay the cost of the 223 test. If the processor does not make such payment to the 224 department within 30 days after receiving the invoice for the 225 testing fee, the department must revoke the registration for 226 that product. 227 (6)âPROHIBITIONS.â 228 (a)âIt is unlawful to serve kratom beverages combined with 229 alcohol, drugs, or other kratom products. 230 (b)âIt is unlawful to sell, deliver, barter, furnish, or 231 give, directly or indirectly, any kratom product to a person who 232 is under 21 years of age. 233 (7)(4)âVIOLATIONS.â 234 (a)âA violation of subsection (4) (3) is a misdemeanor of 235 the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 236 775.083. 237 (b)âA processor that manufactures, delivers, offers for 238 sale, distributes, or sells a finished kratom product that 239 violates paragraph (3)(b) or paragraph (3)(c) commits a 240 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 241 775.082 or s. 775.083. 242 (c)âKratom products possessed, manufactured, delivered, 243 offered for sale, distributed, or sold in violation of this 244 section by an entity regulated under this chapter are subject to 245 s. 500.172 and an immediate stop-sale order, and the entity is 246 subject to penalties as provided in s. 500.121. The department 247 may not grant permission to remove or use, except for disposal, 248 finished kratom products subject to a stop-sale order which are 249 attractive to children until the finished kratom products comply 250 with this section. 251 (d)âIf a processor fails to provide the department with a 252 certificate of analysis within 7 days after receiving a request 253 from the department or fails to immediately report an adverse 254 health event to the department as required by this section, the 255 department may revoke the processorâs finished kratom product 256 registration. 257 (e)âA processor that manufactures, delivers, offers for 258 sale, distributes, or sells a kratom product that contains any 259 controlled substance or adulterants is in violation of this 260 section. 261 (f)âA laboratory that fails to ensure the accuracy of its 262 certificates of analysis issued pursuant to this section is 263 subject to an administrative fine as provided by department 264 rule. 265 (8)(5)âRULES.âThe department shall adopt rules to 266 administer this section. 267 Section 2.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sums of 268 $1,920,141.22 in recurring funds and $1,791,608 in nonrecurring 269 funds from the General Inspection Trust Fund are appropriated to 270 the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, and 24 271 full-time equivalent positions with associated salary rate of 272 $1,508,152.18 are authorized, for the purpose of implementing 273 this act. 274 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.